Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6801
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-6801 to 77-6847 shall be known and may be cited as the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 81;

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 18.
April 17, 2026